North Dakota, session 69, HB1502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-27 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Appropriation - Limitation.
Except as otherwise provided in this section, the total general fund budget approved by the
legislative assembly for a biennium may not be greater than three percent of the general fund
budget approved by the legislative assembly for the previous biennium. If the general fund
budget increase approved by the legislative assembly for a biennium is less than three percent
compared to the previous biennium, the difference between the actual percentage increase and
three percent may be carried forward for up to three bienniums and used to exceed the three
percent increase limitation. This section does not apply to any general fund budget increase that
exceeds three percent if the increase is approved by a two-thirds vote of members elected to
each house of the legislative assembly.
Page No. 1 25.1246.01000